Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Mississippi Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient’s Memorial Highway Act

§ 65-7-171.
Short title.

Sections 65-7-171 and 65-7-173 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient’s Memorial Highway Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 346, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-7-173.
Placement and maintenance of signs designating memorial highways named after recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor to include the words “Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient.”

On any segment of any public street, road, highway or interstate within the state that is named after a person who was awarded a Congressional Medal of Honor, the Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain the signs designating the memorial highway with the words “Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient.” Any such signs that do not contain those words shall be replaced by new signs to comply with Sections 65-7-171 and 65-7-173. Sections 65-7-171 and 65-7-173 shall also apply to bridges or intersections that are part of a public street, road, highway or interstate within this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 346, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.